Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1401.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a subclause and the section is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *(xx.1) Engaging in surveillance pricing.1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *(14) "Surveillance pricing" means offering or setting a customized price for goods or services using technological methods, systems or tools to analyze personal data to inform the price for a specific consumer or group of consumers based, in whole or in part, on personal data that may be purchased from a third party or gathered using technology, including sensors, cameras, device tracking or other forms of observation or data collection. The term does not include circumstances in which the seller can demonstrate that:(i) The difference in pricing if based solely on different costs associated with providing the goods or services to different consumers.(ii) A public discounted price if offered on equal terms pursuant to publicly disclosed eligibility criteria to:(A) all consumers who meet the publicly disclosed eligibility criteria, including criteria related to volume purchases, signing up for a mailing list, registering for promotional communications or participating in a promotional event; or(B) all members of a broadly defined and publicly recognized group of consumers, including teachers, active or retired military personnel, senior citizens, students or residents of a certain area based on publicly disclosed eligibility criteria.(iii) A discounted price if offered on equal terms pursuant to publicly disclosed terms and conditions to all members, enrollees or participants in a loyalty, membership or rewards program.(iv) The person operates as an insurer licensed or regulated or legally authorized to do business in this Commonwealth or any 20260SB1401PN1869 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 surplus lines insurer, including any person acting on behalf of the insurer.(v) The person can demonstrate that a refusal to extend credit at specific terms or the refusal to enter into a transaction with a specific consumer is based on data provided in a consumer report covered by 15 U.S.C. Ch. 41 Subch. III (relating to credit reporting agencies).(15) "Discounted price" means a price that is verifiably lower than the widely available and publicly disclosed bona fide market price.(16) "Personal data" means any information, including unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in combination with other information, to an identified or identifiable individual or a device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual.Section 2. Sections 3(a), 8(b) and 9.2(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 3. Unlawful Acts or Practices; Exclusions.--(a) Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce as defined by subclauses (i) through (xxi) of clause (4) of section 2 of this act and regulations promulgated under section 3.1 of this act are hereby declared unlawful. Any waiver of the surveillance pricing restrictions under this act shall be deemed void and unenforceable. The provisions of this act shall not apply to any owner, agent or employe of any radio or television station, or to any owner, publisher, printer, agent or employe of an Internet service provider or a newspaper or other publication, periodical or circular, who, in good faith and without knowledge of the falsity or deceptive character thereof, publishes, causes 20260SB1401PN1869 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to be published or takes part in the publication of such advertisement.* * *Section 8. Civil Penalties.--* * *(b) In any action brought under section 4 of this act, if the court finds that a person, firm or corporation is wilfully using or has wilfully used a method, act or practice declared unlawful by section 3 of this act, the Attorney General or the appropriate District Attorney, acting in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, may recover, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, a civil penalty of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, except that a civil penalty not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) shall apply for a method, act or practice declared unlawful as defined by subclause (xx.1) of clause (4) of section 2 of this act, which civil penalty shall be in addition to other relief which may be granted under sections 4 and 4.1 of this act. Where the victim of the wilful use of a method, act or practice declared unlawful by section 3 of this act is sixty years of age or older, the civil penalty shall not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) per violation, which penalty shall be in addition to other relief which may be granted under sections 2 and 4.1 of this act.Section 9.2. Private Actions.--(a) Any person who purchases or leases goods or services primarily for personal, family or household purposes and thereby suffers any ascertainable loss of money or property, real or personal, as a result of the use or employment by any person of a method, act or practice declared unlawful by section 3 of this act, may bring a private action to recover actual damages or one hundred dollars ($100), whichever 20260SB1401PN1869 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is greater[.], except that the person may recover actual damages or three thousand dollars ($3,000), whichever is greater, in the case of a method, act or practice declared unlawful as defined by subclause (xx.1) of clause (4) of section 2 of this act. The court may, in its discretion, award up to three times the actual damages sustained, but not less than one hundred dollars ($100), and may provide such additional relief as it deems necessary or proper[.], except that the person may recover actual damages or three thousand dollars ($3,000), whichever is greater, in the case of a method, act or practice declared unlawful as defined by subclause (xx.1) of clause (4) of section 2 of this act. The court may award to the plaintiff, in addition to other relief provided in this section, costs and reasonable attorney fees.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1401PN1869 - 5 - 123456789101112131415